Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 2

Review Committees

62-1-201. Peer review.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires, “review committee” means any person or persons carrying out, administering or overseeing peer review.

The board shall require, by rule, as a condition to renewal of permits under this section, that applicants enroll in a board approved peer review program and undergo at least once every three (3) years, peer reviews conducted in the manner that the board specifies. The review shall include a verification that individuals in the firm who are responsible for supervising attest services and sign or authorize someone to sign the accountant's report on the financial statements on behalf of the firm meet the experience requirements set out in the professional standards for those services; provided, that the rule:

Shall include reasonable provision for compliance by an applicant showing that the applicant has, within the preceding three (3) years, undergone a peer review that is a satisfactory equivalent to peer review generally required pursuant to this subsection (b);

May require, with respect to any organization administering peer review programs contemplated by this section, that the organization be subject to evaluations by the board or the board's designee, to periodically assess the effectiveness of the peer review program under its charge;

Shall require with respect to peer reviews contemplated by this section that licensees timely remit any peer review documents as specified by board rule or upon board request and that such documents be maintained by the board pursuant to § 62-1-116; and

Shall require, with respect to peer reviews contemplated by subdivision (b)(1), that the peer review processes be operated, and documents maintained, in a manner designed to preserve confidentiality under §§ 62-1-116 and 62-1-202 and that no third party, other than the board or the board's designee, shall have access to documents furnished or generated in the course of the peer review.

Acts 1998, ch. 700, § 13; 2016, ch. 595, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-1-201 (Acts 1991, ch. 274, § 1; 1994, ch. 674, § 27), containing definitions, was repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 700, § 13, effective October 1, 1998.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

62-1-202. Review committees — Confidentiality of records and proceedings — Scope of confidentiality.

The proceedings, records, and work papers of a review committee shall be privileged and confidential and shall not be subject to discovery, subpoena, or other means of legal process or introduction into evidence in any civil action, arbitration, or administrative proceeding other than a state board of accountancy proceeding; and no member of the review committee or person who was involved in the peer review process shall be permitted or required to testify in any civil action, arbitration, or administrative proceeding other than a state board of accountancy proceeding as to any matters produced, presented, disclosed, or discussed during or in connection with the peer review process or as to any findings, recommendations, evaluations, opinions, or other actions of the committees or any member of the committees; provided, that information, documents, or records that are publicly available are not immune from discovery or use in any civil action, arbitration, administrative proceeding, or state board of accountancy proceeding merely because they were presented or considered in connection with the peer review process.

The privilege created by this part also does not apply to materials prepared in connection with a particular engagement merely because they happen to be subsequently presented or considered as part of the peer review process, nor does it apply to disputes between review committees and persons or firms subject to a peer review arising from the performance of the peer review.

Acts 1991, ch. 274, § 1; 1998, ch. 700, § 14; 2016, ch. 595, § 4.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

62-1-203. Accountants serving on review committees — Immunity.

Any certified public accountant or public accountant who serves on any review committee is immune from liability with respect to any action taken by the accountant in good faith as a member of the review committee.

Certified public accountants and public accountants, and any other individual appointed to or authorized to perform administrative services for any review committee, are immune from liability for furnishing information, data, reports or records to any review committee or for damages resulting from any decisions, opinions, actions and proceedings rendered, entered or acted upon by the review committees undertaken or performed within the scope or functions of the duties of the review committees, if made or taken in good faith and without malice and on the basis of facts reasonably known or reasonably believed to exist.

Acts 1991, ch. 274, § 1.

62-1-120. Hearings and judicial review.

62-1-125. Notice to board of material changes in licensee's status or other information.